Utah statutes.
35A-8-803.   Division -- Functions.

(1)  In addition to any other functions the governor or Legislature may assign:

(a)  the division shall:

(i)  provide a clearinghouse of information for federal, state, and local housing assistance programs;

(ii)  establish, in cooperation with political subdivisions, model plans and management methods to encourage or provide for the development of affordable housing that may be adopted by political subdivisions by reference;

(iii)  undertake, in cooperation with political subdivisions, a realistic assessment of problems relating to housing needs, such as:

(A)  inadequate supply of dwellings;

(B)  substandard dwellings; and

(C)  inability of medium and low income families to obtain adequate housing;

(iv)  provide the information obtained under Subsection (1)(a)(iii) to:

(A)  political subdivisions;

(B)  real estate developers;

(C)  builders;

(D)  lending institutions;

(E)  affordable housing advocates; and

(F)  others having use for the information;

(v)  advise political subdivisions of serious housing problems existing within their jurisdiction that require concerted public action for solution; and

(vi)  assist political subdivisions in defining housing objectives and in preparing for adoption a plan of action covering a five-year period designed to accomplish housing objectives within their jurisdiction; and

(b)  within legislative appropriations, the division may accept for and on behalf of, and bind the state to, any federal housing or homeless program in which the state is invited, permitted, or authorized to participate in the distribution, disbursement, or administration of any funds or service advanced, offered, or contributed in whole or in part by the federal government.

(2)  The administration of any federal housing program in which the state is invited, permitted, or authorized to participate in distribution, disbursement, or administration of funds or services, except those administered by the Utah Housing Corporation, is governed by Sections 35A-8-501 through 35A-8-508.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

